Utah statutes.
31A-17-605.   Authorized control level event.
(1)  "Authorized control level event" means any of the following events:
(a)  the filing of an RBC report by the insurer or health organization that
indicates that the insurer's or health organization's total adjusted capital
is greater than or equal to its mandatory control level RBC but less than its
authorized control level RBC;
(b)  the notification by the commissioner to the insurer or health
organization of an adjusted RBC report that indicates the event in Subsection
(1)(a), provided the insurer or health organization does not challenge the
adjusted RBC report under Section 31A-17-607;
(c)  if, pursuant to Section 31A-17-607, the insurer or health organization
challenges an adjusted RBC report that indicates the event in Subsection
(1)(a), notification by the commissioner to the insurer or health organization
that after a hearing the commissioner rejects the insurer's or health
organization's challenge;
(d)  the failure of the insurer or health organization to respond, in a manner
satisfactory to the commissioner, to a corrective order, provided the insurer
or health organization has not challenged the corrective order under Section
31A-17-607; or
(e)  if the insurer or health organization has challenged a corrective order
under Section 31A-17-607 and the commissioner after a hearing rejects the
challenge or modifies the corrective order, the failure of the insurer or
health organization to respond, in a manner satisfactory to the commissioner,
to the corrective order subsequent to rejection or modification by the
commissioner.
(2) (a)  In the event of an authorized control level event with respect to an
insurer or health organization, the commissioner shall:
(i)  take any action required under Section 31A-17-604 regarding an insurer or
health organization with respect to which a regulatory action level event has
occurred; or
(ii)  take any action as is necessary to cause the insurer or health
organization to be placed under regulatory control under Chapter 27, Part 5,
Administrative Actions, if the commissioner considers it to be in the best
interests of:
(A)  the policyholders or members;
(B)  creditors of the insurer or health organization; and
(C)  the public.
(b) If the commissioner takes an action described in Subsection (2)(a), the
authorized control level event is sufficient grounds for the commissioner to
take action under Chapter 27, Part 5, Administrative Actions, and the
commissioner shall have the rights, powers, and duties with respect to the
insurer or health organization set forth in Chapter 27, Part 5, Administrative
Actions.
(c)  If the commissioner takes an action under Subsection (2)(a) pursuant to
an adjusted RBC report, the insurer or health organization is entitled to the
protections afforded to an insurer or health organization under Section
31A-27-504 pertaining to an action by the commissioner.
